Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 7. Survival and Wrongful Death Actions.

Sec. 09.55.570.
All causes of action survive.

All causes of action by one person against another, whether arising on contract or otherwise, except those involving defamation of character, survive to the personal representatives of the former and against the personal representatives of the latter, but this may not be construed so as to abate an action for a wrong where any party has died after the verdict or to defeat or prejudice the right of action given by AS

09.15.010

.
The personal representatives may maintain an action thereon against the party against whom the cause of action accrued, or, after the party’s death, against the personal representatives of the party.

History.

(§ 4 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 34 ch 56 SLA 1973)

Editor’s notes. —

This section was taken from former AS 13.20.330 which, in turn, was taken from § 61-7-1, ACLA 1949, as amended.

Sec. 09.55.580.
Action for wrongful death.

Except as provided under (f) of this section and AS

09.65.145

, when the death of a person is caused by the wrongful act or omission of another, the personal representatives of the former may maintain an action therefor against the latter, if the former might have maintained an action, had the person lived, against the latter for an injury done by the same act or omission. The action shall be commenced within two years after the death, and the damages therein shall be the damages the court or jury may consider fair and just. The amount recovered, if any, shall be exclusively for the benefit of the decedent’s spouse and children when the decedent is survived by a spouse or children, or other dependents. When the decedent is survived by no spouse or children or other dependents, the amount recovered shall be administered as other personal property of the decedent but shall be limited to pecuniary loss. When the plaintiff prevails, the trial court shall determine the allowable costs and expenses of the action and may, in its discretion, require notice and hearing thereon. The amount recovered shall be distributed only after payment of all costs and expenses of suit and debts and expenses of administration.

The damages recoverable under this section shall be limited to those which are the natural and proximate consequence of the negligent or wrongful act or omission of another.

In fixing the amount of damages to be awarded under this section, the court or jury shall consider all the facts and circumstances and from them fix the award at a sum which will fairly compensate for the injury resulting from the death. In determining the amount of the award, the court or jury shall consider but is not limited to the following:

deprivation of the expectation of pecuniary benefits to the beneficiary or beneficiaries, without regard to age thereof, that would have resulted from the continued life of the deceased and without regard to probable accumulations or what the deceased may have saved during the lifetime of the deceased;

loss of contributions for support;

loss of assistance or services irrespective of age or relationship of decedent to the beneficiary or beneficiaries;

loss of consortium;

loss of prospective training and education;

medical and funeral expenses.

The death of a beneficiary or beneficiaries before judgment does not affect the amount of damages recoverable under this section.

The right of action granted by this section is not abated by the death of a person named or to be named the defendant.

A person whose act or omission constitutes the felonious killing of another person may not recover damages for the death of that person either directly or as a personal representative of that person’s estate. In this subsection, a “felonious killing” means a crime defined by AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.140

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 78 SLA 1972; am §§ 1, 2 ch 164 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 122 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, “or” was substituted for “of” after “accumulations” in paragraph (c)(1) of this section to correct a typographical error in the 1962 codification of § 61-7-3, ACLA 1949, as amended.

Editor’s notes. —

This section was taken from former AS 13.20.340 which, in turn, was taken from § 61-7-3, ACLA 1949, as amended.

Sec. 09.55.585.
Action for wrongful death of an unborn child; applicability.

A parent of an unborn child may maintain an action as plaintiff for the death of an unborn child that was caused by the wrongful act or omission of another.

This section does not apply to acts or omissions that

cause the death of an unborn child if those acts or omissions are committed during a legal abortion to which the pregnant woman or a person authorized by law to act on her behalf consents or for which consent is implied by law;

are committed under usual and customary standards of medical practice during diagnostic testing, during therapeutic treatment, or while assisting a pregnancy; or

are committed by a pregnant woman against herself and her unborn child.

This section does not limit any other cause of action that a parent may maintain for the death of an unborn child.

In this section,

“abortion” has the meaning given in AS

18.16.090

;

“unborn child” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For provision permitting a parent to maintain an action as plaintiff for the death of a child, see AS

09.15.010

.

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 77, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect on October 8, 2014.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 3, ch. 77, SLA 2014, this section applies to “actions arising from a wrongful act or omission that takes place on or after October 8, 2014.”